Florida, session 2026, SB296.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 25 26 Section 1.âDomestic and dating violence 911 alert system 27 feasibility study.â 28 (1)âAs used in this section, the term: 29 (a)ââDivisionâ means the Division of Telecommunications 30 within the Department of Management Services. 31 (b)ââEnhanced 911â has the same meaning as in s. 32 365.172(3), Florida Statutes. 33 (c)ââNext Generation 911â has the same meaning as in s. 34 365.172(3), Florida Statutes. 35 (d)ââPublic safety agencyâ has the same meaning as in s. 36 365.172(3), Florida Statutes. 37 (e)ââPublic safety answering pointâ or âPSAPâ has the same 38 meaning as in s. 365.172(3), Florida Statutes. 39 (2)âThe division shall consult with enhanced 911 and Next 40 Generation 911 service providers; state, county, and municipal 41 PSAPs; and state and local public safety agencies to conduct a 42 feasibility study regarding the creation of a web-based 911 43 alert system for use by victims of domestic violence and dating 44 violence which is capable of: 45 (a)âEnsuring real-time data-sharing between PSAPs and law 46 enforcement agencies. 47 (b)âCreating a unique telephone number for each user which 48 will connect the user to a PSAP. 49 (c)âCreating a user-generated numerical code or phrase that 50 can be utilized by the user after contacting a PSAP and that 51 indicates the userâs need for immediate law enforcement 52 assistance. 53 (d)âTransmitting specified data to law enforcement agencies 54 when a user calls from his or her unique telephone number and 55 enters his or her numerical code or phrase. 56 (3)âBy January 31, 2027, the division shall report to the 57 President of the Senate and the Speaker of the House of 58 Representatives the results of the feasibility study. 59 Section 2.âSection 741.401, Florida Statutes, is amended to 60 read: 61 741.401âLegislative findings; purpose.âThe Legislature 62 finds that persons attempting to escape from actual or 63 threatened domestic violence or dating violence frequently 64 establish new addresses in order to prevent their assailants or 65 probable assailants from finding them. The purpose of ss. 66 741.401-741.409 is to enable state and local agencies to respond 67 to requests for public records without disclosing the location 68 of a victim of domestic violence or dating violence, to enable 69 interagency cooperation with the Attorney General in providing 70 address confidentiality for victims of domestic violence and 71 dating violence, and to enable state and local agencies to 72 accept a program participantâs use of an address designated by 73 the Attorney General as a substitute mailing address. 74 Section 3.âSection 741.402, Florida Statutes, is reordered 75 and amended to read: 76 741.402âDefinitions; ss. 741.401-741.409.âUnless the 77 context clearly requires otherwise, as used in ss. 741.401 78 741.409, the term: 79 (1)ââAddressâ means a residential street address, school 80 address, or work address of an individual, as specified on the 81 individualâs application to be a program participant under ss. 82 741.401-741.409. 83 (4)(2)ââProgram participantâ means a person certified as a 84 program participant under s. 741.403. 85 (2)ââDating violenceâ means any assault, aggravated 86 assault, battery, aggravated battery, sexual assault, sexual 87 battery, stalking, aggravated stalking, kidnapping, false 88 imprisonment, or any criminal offense resulting in physical 89 injury or death, or the threat of any such act, committed by an 90 individual who has or has had a continuing and significant 91 relationship of a romantic or intimate nature as determined by 92 the factors listed in s. 784.046(1)(d) with the victim, 93 regardless of whether these acts or threats have been reported 94 to law enforcement officers. 95 (3)ââDomestic violenceâ means an act as defined in s. 96 741.28 and includes a threat of such acts committed against an 97 individual in a domestic situation, regardless of whether these 98 acts or threats have been reported to law enforcement officers. 99 Section 4.âParagraphs (a) and (d) of subsection (1) of 100 section 741.403, Florida Statutes, are amended to read: 101 741.403âAddress confidentiality program; application; 102 certification.â 103 (1)âAn adult person, a parent or guardian acting on behalf 104 of a minor, or a guardian acting on behalf of a person 105 adjudicated incapacitated under chapter 744 may apply to the 106 Attorney General to have an address designated by the Attorney 107 General serve as the personâs address or the address of the 108 minor or incapacitated person. To the extent possible within 109 funds appropriated for this purpose, the Attorney General shall 110 approve an application if it is filed in the manner and on the 111 form prescribed by the Attorney General and if it contains all 112 of the following: 113 (a)âA sworn statement by the applicant that the applicant 114 has good reason to believe that the applicant, or the minor or 115 incapacitated person on whose behalf the application is made, is 116 a victim of domestic violence or dating violence, and that the 117 applicant fears for his or her safety or his or her childrenâs 118 safety or the safety of the minor or incapacitated person on 119 whose behalf the application is made. 120 (d)âA statement that the new address or addresses that the 121 applicant requests must not be disclosed for the reason that 122 disclosure will increase the risk of domestic violence or dating 123 violence. 124 Section 5.âSection 741.408, Florida Statutes, is amended to 125 read: 126 741.408âAssistance for program applicants.âThe Attorney 127 General shall designate state and local agencies and nonprofit 128 agencies that provide counseling and shelter services to victims 129 of domestic violence and dating violence to assist persons 130 applying to be program participants. Assistance and counseling 131 rendered by the Office of the Attorney General or its designees 132 to applicants does not constitute legal advice. 133 Section 6.âSection 741.4651, Florida Statutes, is amended 134 to read: 135 741.4651âPublic records exemption; victims of stalking or 136 aggravated stalking.âThe names, addresses, and telephone numbers 137 of persons who are victims of stalking or aggravated stalking 138 are exempt from s. 119.07(1) and s. 24(a), Art. I of the State 139 Constitution in the same manner that the names, addresses, and 140 telephone numbers of participants in the Address Confidentiality 141 Program for Victims of Domestic and Dating Violence which are 142 held by the Attorney General under s. 741.465 are exempt from 143 disclosure, provided that the victim files a sworn statement of 144 stalking with the Office of the Attorney General and otherwise 145 complies with the procedures in ss. 741.401-741.409. 146 Section 7.âParagraph (c) of subsection (1) of section 147 960.001, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 148 960.001âGuidelines for fair treatment of victims and 149 witnesses in the criminal justice and juvenile justice systems.â 150 (1)âThe Department of Legal Affairs, the state attorneys, 151 the Department of Corrections, the Department of Juvenile 152 Justice, the Florida Commission on Offender Review, the State 153 Courts Administrator and circuit court administrators, the 154 Department of Law Enforcement, and every sheriffâs department, 155 police department, or other law enforcement agency as defined in 156 s. 943.10(4) shall develop and implement guidelines for the use 157 of their respective agencies, which guidelines are consistent 158 with the purposes of this act and s. 16(b), Art. I of the State 159 Constitution and are designed to implement s. 16(b), Art. I of 160 the State Constitution and to achieve the following objectives: 161 (c)âInformation concerning protection available to victim 162 or witness.âA victim or witness shall be furnished, as a matter 163 of course, with information on steps that are available to law 164 enforcement officers and state attorneys to protect victims and 165 witnesses from intimidation. Victims of domestic violence and 166 dating violence shall also be given information about the 167 address confidentiality program provided under s. 741.403. 168 Section 8.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.